Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 184 of Title 21, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any person employed by a state agency, department, or political
subdivision of this state that knowingly and willfully uses their
official authority for the purpose of interfering with or affecting
the nomination or the election of any candidate for state office,
including Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Member of the Oklahoma
State Senate, Member of the Oklahoma House of Representatives, or
any other statewide elected position, shall be guilty of a felony
punishable by a fine of up to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) or

Req. No. 11024 Page 1

by i mprisonment in the State Penitentiary for not more than one (1)
year, or by both such fine and imprisonment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11024 MJ 01/13/25



















Req. No. 11024 Page 2